Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 6. Government Employees Deferred Compensation Plan Act.

§ 51.1-600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Act”
means the Government Employees Deferred Compensation Plan Act.

“Board”
means the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

“Deferred compensation plan”
means a plan established pursuant to the provisions of § 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that may provide for elective and non-elective deferrals of compensation by or on behalf of employees and may include a qualified Roth contribution program as described in § 402A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Employee”
means, in the case of the plan described in §

51.1-602

, all persons employed by a participating employer, including appointed or elected officials. In the case of a plan adopted by a county, municipality, authority or other political subdivision pursuant to §

51.1-603

, an employee shall be defined by such county, municipality, authority or other political subdivision, subject to the approval of the Board.

“Participating employer”
means the Commonwealth or any political subdivision that has elected pursuant to §

51.1-603.1

to participate in the deferred compensation plan established by the Board pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1974, c. 461, § 51-111.67:15; 1987, c. 619; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 276; 1999, cc. 980, 984; 2002, c. 311; 2007, c. 253; 2014, cc. 356, 747.

Cross references.

For chapter providing for a cash match plan, see now §

51.1-607

et seq.

As to investments under this chapter and the Investment of Public Funds Act, see §

2.2-4501

.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 980 and 984 are identical, and effective January 1, 2000, added the paragraphs defining “Deferred compensation plan,” “Participating employer,” and “Qualified participant.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 311 substituted “Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended” for “Internal Revenue Code” at the end of the definition of “Deferred compensation plan”; rewrote the definition of “Employee”; deleted “or a sponsor of a plan established pursuant to § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended” at the end of the definition of “Participating Employer”; and deleted the former definition of “Qualified Participant.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 253, in the definition of “Deferred compensation plan,” substituted “by which an employee defers” for “which allows an employee to elect to defer” near the beginning.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 in the definition of “Employee” inserted “subject to the approval of the Board.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 747, effective July 1, 2015, in the definition of “Deferred compensation plan,” deleted “by which an employee defers some portion of income until some stated time in the future; provides that the federal and state income tax on such income will be deferred until the actual receipt of such income; and is” following “means a plan,” inserted “(b)” following “§ 457” and added the language beginning “that may provide for elective and non-elective deferrals” to the end of the paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Administrative fees may not be charged to participants in Government Employees Deferred Compensation Plan Act. —

Participating employers or employees who participate in the Government Employees Deferred Compensation Plan Act may not be charged the administrative fees related to the Virginia Retirement System program oversight. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. W. Forrest Matthews, Jr., Director, Virginia Retirement System, 01-123 (4/29/02).

§ 51.1-601.
Contract for deferred compensation.

In accordance with a plan of deferred compensation, the Commonwealth, or any state agency, county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision may contract with any employee to defer all or any portion of that employee’s otherwise payable compensation and, pursuant to the terms of the plan and in such proportions as may be designated or directed under the plan, place such deferred compensation in investment products selected by the Commonwealth and its agencies, county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision. All investment products shall be offered in compliance with applicable federal and state laws and regulations by persons who are duly authorized by applicable state and federal authorities.

History.

1974, c. 461, § 51-111.67:16; 1987, c. 619; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 276; 2002, c. 311; 2007, c. 253.

Cross references.

As to funds under this section being exempt from the Investment of Public Funds Act, see §

2.2-4501

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 311 inserted “authority” following “municipality” twice in this section.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 253 substituted “may contract with” for “may, by contract, agree with” in the first sentence.

§ 51.1-601.1.
Participation in plan by certain employees.

All employees of the Commonwealth and its agencies commencing employment or who are reemployed on or after January 1, 2008, in a position covered by the Virginia Retirement System, and who (i) have not elected to participate in a plan established pursuant to § 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or (ii) do not participate in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, shall participate in the plan described in §

51.1-602

, unless such employee elects, in a manner prescribed by the Board, not to participate in such plan. The amount of the deferral for any such employee participating in the plan shall equal, on a semimonthly basis, $20 of otherwise payable compensation, unless the employee elects to defer a different amount.

History.

2007, c. 253; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2013, c. 463.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and inserted the clause (i) designator and “or (ii) §

51.1-169

” in the first sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 inserted the present clause (i) designator, deleted the former clause (i) designator preceding “§ 403(b),” and inserted “do not participate in the hybrid retirement program described in” at the beginning of clause (ii).

§ 51.1-602.
Deferred compensation plan for employees of the Commonwealth; administered by the Board.

The Board shall establish and administer a deferred compensation plan for employees of the Commonwealth and its agencies. The Virginia Retirement System Director shall be the chief administrative officer of the plan. The Board may contract with private corporations or institutions subject to the standards set forth in §

51.1-124.30

to provide investment products as well as any other goods and services related to the administration of the deferred compensation plan. The Virginia Retirement System is hereby authorized to perform related services including, but not limited to, providing consolidated billing, individual and collective record keeping and accountings, and asset purchase, control, and safekeeping. In accordance with such plan, and upon contract or agreement with an eligible employee, deferrals of compensation may be accomplished by payroll deductions made by the appropriate officer of the Commonwealth, with such funds being thereafter held and administered in accordance with the plan. Administrative fees related to the VRS program oversight that otherwise would be charged to an employee participating in the plan shall be paid by the participating employer under procedures established by the Board. Any political subdivision participating in the plan pursuant to §

51.1-603.1

may collect the administrative fee imposed by the Virginia Retirement System from employees participating in the plan.

If it deems it advisable, the Board may create a trust or other special fund for the segregation of the funds or assets resulting from compensation deferred at the request of employees of the Commonwealth or its agencies and for the implementation of such program.

The Department of Accounts shall be responsible for the (i) accounting and reconciliations associated with state employees’ contributions to the plan through payroll deductions and (ii) timely transfer of withheld funds to the private corporation or institution designated by the Board pursuant to subsection A. However, any state agency that has decentralized its payroll function and any political subdivision of the Commonwealth participating in the plan pursuant to §

51.1-603.1

shall be responsible for the (i) accounting and reconciliations associated with their employees’ contributions to the plan through payroll deductions and (ii) timely transfer of withheld funds to the private corporation or institution designated by the Board pursuant to subsection A.

History.

1974, c. 461, § 51-111.67:17; 1984, cc. 662, 746; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 619; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 276; 1997, c. 174; 1998, c. 658; 2000, c. 395; 2004, c. 86; 2008, c. 245.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection C, added the clause (i) and clause (ii) designations, and added the present last sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 395 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 86 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 245 deleted former subsection D, which limited liability of the Commonwealth, the Board of Trustees of the Retirement System, the employees thereof, and the Advisory Committee.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Administrative fees may not be charged to the Department of Accounts. —

The Virginia Retirement System may not charge the Department of Accounts for the administrative fees that previously were charged to all employees of the Commonwealth prior to the 2000 amendment to subsection A. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. W. Forrest Matthews, Jr., Director, Virginia Retirement System, 01-123 (4/29/02).

§ 51.1-603.
Local deferred compensation plans.

Any county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth may by ordinance or resolution adopt and establish for itself and its employees a deferred compensation plan. Any such deferred compensation plan may include constitutional officers and their employees. The ordinance or resolution adopting or establishing such plan shall create or designate an appropriate board or officer to administer the plan, and shall confer upon such board or officer the authority to do all things by way of supervision, administration, and implementation of the plan, including the power to contract with private corporations or institutions for services in connection therewith. The deferral of compensation may be accomplished by payroll deductions by the appropriate officer of the county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision.

If it deems it advisable, any county, municipality, authority, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, which by ordinance or resolution adopts and establishes for itself and its employees a deferred compensation plan, may (i) create a trust or other special fund for the segregation of the funds or assets resulting from compensation deferred at the request of its employees for the implementation of such plan or (ii) provide that its employees who commence employment or reemployment on or after a specified date, and who have not affirmatively elected to participate in such deferred compensation plan or in a plan established by such political subdivision pursuant to § 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall participate in either such deferred compensation plan or 403(b) plan, as determined by the political subdivision, at such initial default amount or rate of deferral as it may determine, unless such employee elects, in a manner prescribed by the plan administrator, not to participate in the plan.

History.

1974, c. 461, § 51-111.67:18; 1982, c. 364; 1987, c. 619; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 379; 1997, c. 174; 2012, c. 660.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 660, in subsection B, added the clause (i) designator and clause (ii).

§ 51.1-603.1.
Participation by employees of political subdivisions in deferred compensation plan of Virginia Retirement System.

The Virginia Retirement System may enter into an agreement with any political subdivision of the Commonwealth to permit participation by the political subdivision’s employees in the deferred compensation plan established and administered by the Board pursuant to §

51.1-602

, except that political subdivisions of the Commonwealth otherwise participating in the retirement system pursuant to Article 5 (§

51.1-130

et seq.) of Chapter 1 shall participate in the deferred compensation plan established and administered by the Board pursuant to §

51.1-602

to the extent necessary to provide benefits under the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

.

The political subdivision may provide in the agreement that its employees who (i) commence employment or reemployment on or after a specified date occurring on or after the effective date of this provision in the agreement, (ii) are not participating in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, and (iii) have not affirmatively elected to participate in the plan described in §

51.1-602

or a plan established by such political subdivision pursuant to § 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall participate in either such plan described in §

51.1-602

or a 403(b) plan, as determined by the political subdivision, unless such employee elects, in a manner prescribed by the Board, not to participate in such plan. The amount of the deferral for any such employee participating in the plan shall equal, on a semimonthly basis, $20 of otherwise payable compensation, unless the employee elects to defer a greater amount.

History.

1997, c. 174; 2012, cc. 660, 701, 823; 2013, c. 463.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 660 added the subsection A designator and subsection B.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and added the exception at the end of subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463, in subsection B, inserted the clause (i) and (iii) designators, added clause (ii), and deleted “who” at the beginning of clause (iii).

§ 51.1-604.
Standards for deferred compensation plans.

No deferred compensation plan shall become effective until the Board, county, municipality, authority or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth is satisfied, by opinion of its respective counsel, such federal agency or agencies as may be deemed necessary, or otherwise, that the contributions thereunder and/or the investment products purchased pursuant to the plan (i) will not be included in the employee’s taxable income under federal or state law until it is actually received by the employee under the terms of the plan, provided that such contributions will nonetheless be deemed compensation at the time of deferral for the purposes of social security coverage, for the purposes of the Virginia Retirement System, and for any other retirement, pension, or benefit program established by law, or (ii) are designated Roth contributions as defined in § 402A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

History.

1974, c. 461, § 51-111.67:19; 1987, c. 619; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 276; 2002, c. 311; 2014, c. 747.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 311 substituted “municipality, authority or other political subdivision” for “municipality, or political subdivision” near the beginning of the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 747, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “contributions” for “compensation deferred” and “compensation,” “provided” for “and (ii),” inserted “or (ii) are designated Roth contributions as defined in § 402A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 51.1-605.
Other retirement, pension, etc., systems not affected; annual report.

Any deferred compensation program established by this chapter, and any plan adopted hereunder, shall exist and serve in addition to any other retirement, pension, or benefit system established by the Commonwealth, its agencies, counties, municipalities, authorities, or other political subdivisions, and shall not supersede, make inoperative, or reduce any benefits provided by the Virginia Retirement System or by any other retirement, pension, or benefit program established by law.

The Virginia Retirement System shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly advising them of the condition of the Commonwealth’s fund and all operational costs associated with such fund. This report shall be submitted annually on or before December 31.

The Board shall have the authority to establish a plan pursuant to § 401 (a) or § 403 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, for the purpose of implementation of this section.

History.

1974, c. 461, § 51-111.67:20; 1987, c. 619; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 276; 2002, c. 311; 2006, c. 66.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 311 inserted “authorities” in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, substituted “Commonwealth’s fund” for “fund” and “such fund” for “the fund”; and added the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 66 added the last sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 51.1-606.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 311, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For chapter providing for a cash match plan, see now §

51.1-607

et seq.